Utah statutes.
34-29-12.   Register of applicants to be kept -- Open for inspection.
Each employment agent shall keep a register, to be known as "labor applicants'
register," which shall show the name of each person seeking work or employment
to whom information or assistance is furnished and the amount of the
commission received in each such case therefor; the name of each person who,
having received and paid for any information or assistance described in
Section 34-29-1, fails to secure the employment regarding which such
information or assistance is furnished, together with the reason why such
employment was not by such person secured, and the name of each to whom return
is made in accordance with the provisions of Section 34-29-9 of any money or
other consideration under Section 34-29-9, together with the amount or the
value of consideration thus returned. The registers required by Section
34-29-11 and by this section shall be open at all reasonable hours to the
inspection of any peace officer of this state.
